nl: Componentpositie: Midden; Voorkant; Linkerkant; Onder; Achterkant; Rechterkant; Boven; Overig
cs: Poloha komponenty: Střed; Vpředu; Levá strana; Dole; Vzadu; Pravá strana; Nahoře; Jiné
es: Posición del componente: Centro; Delantero; Lado izquierdo; Inferior; Trasero; Lado derecho; Superior; Otro
en: Component position: Center; Front; Left side; Lower; Rear; Right side; Upper; Other
da: Komponentplacering: Midt; Forrest; Venstre side; Nederst; Bagest; Højre side; Øverst; Anden
pl: Położenie komponentu: Środek; Przód; Lewa strona; Dół; Tył; Prawa strona; Góra; Inne
sk-SK: Poloha komponentu: Stred; Predná časť; Ľavá strana; Dolná časť; Zadná časť; Pravá strana; Horná časť; Iné
ko: 구성품 위치: 중앙; 전면; 좌측; 하단; 후면; 우측; 상단; 기타
it: Posizione del componente: Centrale; Anteriore; Lato sinistro; Inferiore; Posteriore; Lato destro; Superiore; Altro
fr: Position du composant: Centre; Avant; Côté gauche; Inférieur; Arrière; Côté droit; Supérieur; Autre
fi: Komponentin sijainti: Keskellä; Edessä; Vasemmalla; Alhaalla; Takana; Oikealla; Ylhäällä; Muu
hu: Alkatrész elhelyezkedése: Középső; Elülső; Bal oldali; Alsó; Hátsó; Jobb oldali; Felső; Egyéb
de: Komponentenposition: Mitte; Vorne; Linke Seite; Unten; Hinten; Rechte Seite; Oben; Sonstige
ro-RO: Poziția componentei: Centru; Față; Partea stângă; Inferior; Spate; Partea dreaptă; Superior; Altele
ru: Положение компонента: По центру; Спереди; Слева; Снизу; Сзади; Справа; Сверху; Другое
th: ตำแหน่งของส่วนประกอบ: ตรงกลาง; ด้านหน้า; ด้านซ้าย; ด้านล่าง; ด้านหลัง; ด้านขวา; ด้านบน; อื่นๆ
nb: Komponentposisjon: Midten; Foran; Venstre side; Nedre; Bak; Høyre side; Øvre; Annet
zh-CN: 组件位置: 居中; 前部; 左侧; 下部; 后部; 右侧; 上部; 其他
pt-PT: Posição do componente: Centro; Frente; Lado esquerdo; Inferior; Traseira; Lado direito; Superior; Outra
sv: Komponentens position: Mitten; Fram; Vänster sida; Nedre; Bak; Höger sida; Övre; Annan
hr-HR: Položaj komponente: Sredina; Prednji dio; Lijeva strana; Donji dio; Stražnji dio; Desna strana; Gornji dio; Ostalo
sl-SI: Položaj komponente: Sredina; Spredaj; Leva stran; Spodaj; Zadaj; Desna stran; Zgoraj; Drugo
ja: コンポーネントの位置: 中央; フロント; 左側; 下部; リア; 右側; 上部; その他
pt-BR: Posição do componente: Centro; Frente; Lado esquerdo; Inferior; Traseira; Lado direito; Superior; Outro
bg-BG: Позиция на компонента: Център; Предна част; Лява страна; Долна част; Задна част; Дясна страна; Горна част; Друго
tr: Bileşen konumu: Orta; Ön; Sol yan; Alt; Arka; Sağ yan; Üst; Diğer
lt-LT: Komponento padėtis: Centras; Priekis; Kairė pusė; Apačia; Galas; Dešinė pusė; Viršus; Kita
el: Θέση εξαρτήματος: Κέντρο; Μπροστά; Αριστερή πλευρά; Κάτω; Πίσω; Δεξιά πλευρά; Επάνω; Άλλο
zh-TW: 組件位置: 中央; 前面; 左側; 下方; 後面; 右側; 上方; 其他
vi: Vị trí linh kiện: Giữa; Trước; Bên trái; Dưới; Sau; Bên phải; Trên; Khác